ja: ハードトップ仕上げタイプ: ゲルコート; 塗装 (同色); 塗装 (別色); プライマー/下地; テクスチャード (ブラック); 未仕上げ; その他
ru: Тип отделки хардтопа: Гелькоут; Окрашенный (в цвет кузова); Окрашенный (не в цвет кузова); Грунт/загрунтованный; Текстурированная (черная); Без отделки; Другое
en: Hardtop finish type: Gel coat; Painted (matched); Painted (unmatched); Primer/primed; Textured (black); Unfinished; Other
th: ประเภทการตกแต่งหลังคาแข็ง: เคลือบเจล; พ่นสี (สีเดียวกับตัวรถ); พ่นสี (สีไม่ตรงกับตัวรถ); สีรองพื้น; มีพื้นผิว (สีดำ); ไม่ทำสี; อื่นๆ
el: Τύπος φινιρίσματος σκληρής οροφής: Gel coat; Βαμμένο (στο ίδιο χρώμα); Βαμμένο (σε διαφορετικό χρώμα); Αστάρι/ασταρωμένο; Ανάγλυφο (μαύρο); Χωρίς φινίρισμα; Άλλο
nl: Hardtop afwerking type: Gelcoat; Gespoten (kleur-matchend); Gespoten (niet kleur-matchend); Primer/gegrond; Gestructureerd (zwart); Onbewerkt; Overig
fi: Kovan katon viimeistelyn tyyppi: Geelipinnoite; Maalattu (sävy sovitettu); Maalattu (sävyä ei sovitettu); Pohjustettu; Teksturoitu (musta); Käsittelemätön; Muu
bg-BG: Тип покритие на твърдия покрив: Гел покритие; Боядисан (съвпадащ); Боядисан (несъвпадащ); Грунд/грундиран; Текстуриран (черен); Незавършен; Друго
da: Type af hardtop-finish: Gelcoat; Malet (matchende); Malet (ikke matchende); Grunder/grundet; Tekstureret (sort); Ubehandlet; Andet
vi: Loại hoàn thiện mui cứng: Phủ gel; Sơn (đồng màu); Sơn (khác màu); Sơn lót; Bề mặt nhám (đen); Chưa hoàn thiện; Khác
sl-SI: Vrsta premaza trde strehe: Gelcoat premaz; Barvano (ujemajoče); Barvano (neujemajoče); Temeljni premaz/osnovano; Teksturirano (črno); Neobdelano; Drugo
it: Finitura tipo Hardtop: Gelcoat; Verniciato (in tinta); Verniciato (non in tinta); Primer/con primer; Testurizzato (nero); Grezzo; Altro
zh-CN: 硬顶表面处理类型: 胶衣; 涂漆（配色）; 涂漆（不配色）; 底漆/已涂底漆; 纹理（黑色）; 未处理; 其他
sk-SK: Typ povrchovej úpravy pevnej strechy: Gélový náter; Lakovanie (zladené); Lakovanie (nezladené); Základný náter; Textúrované (čierne); Bez povrchovej úpravy; Iné
pt-PT: Tipo de acabamento Hardtop: Gel coat; Pintado (combinado); Pintado (não combinado); Primário/com primário; Texturado (preto); Inacabado; Outro
lt-LT: Kieto stogo apdailos tipas: Gelio danga; Nudažytas (suderintas); Nudažytas (nesuderintas); Gruntas / gruntuotas; Tekstūrinis (juodas); Neapdailintas; Kita
es: Tipo de acabado de techo rígido: Capa de gel; Pintado (a juego); Pintado (sin combinar); Imprimador/imprimado; Texturizado (negro); Sin terminar; Otro
pl: Typ wykończenia hardtopu: Żelkot; Malowane (dopasowane); Malowane (niedopasowane); Podkład / zagruntowane; Teksturowane (czarne); Niewykończone; Inne
sv: Typ av hårdtop-finish: Gelcoat; Lackerad (matchande); Lackerad (omatchande); Grundfärg/grundmålad; Strukturerad (svart); Obehandlad; Övrigt
de: Typ der Hardtop-Oberfläche: Gelcoat; Lackiert (angepasst); Lackiert (nicht angepasst); Grundierung/grundiert; Strukturiert (Schwarz); Unbehandelt; Sonstige
tr: Sabit tavan kaplama türü: Jelkot; Boyalı (eşleşen); Boyalı (eşleşmeyen); Astar/astarlanmış; Dokulu (siyah); İşlem görmemiş; Diğer
zh-TW: 硬頂表面處理類型: 膠衣; 烤漆 (同色); 烤漆 (不同色); 底漆 / 已上底漆; 紋理 (黑色); 未加工; 其他
pt-BR: Tipo de acabamento da capota rígida: Gel coat; Pintado (cor correspondente); Pintado (cor não correspondente); Com primer; Texturizado (preto); Sem acabamento; Outro
ro-RO: Tip finisaj hardtop: Strat de gel (gel coat); Vopsit (asortat); Vopsit (neasortat); Grund / acoperit cu grund; Texturat (negru); Nefinisat; Altele
nb: Hardtop-overflatetype: Gelcoat; Lakkert (fargematchet); Lakkert (ikke fargematchet); Grunning/grunnet; Teksturert (svart); Ubehandlet; Annet
cs: Typ povrchové úpravy pevné střechy: Gel coat; Lakovaný (v barvě vozu); Lakovaný (jiná barva); Základní nátěr; Texturovaný (černý); Bez povrchové úpravy; Jiný
hu: Keménytető kivitel típusa: Gélbevonat; Festett (színre fújt); Festett (nem színre fújt); Alapozott; Texturált (fekete); Kezeletlen; Egyéb
ko: 하드탑 마감 유형: 겔 코트; 도색(매치형); 도색(비매치형); 프라이머/프라이밍; 질감 처리(블랙); 미마감; 기타
fr: Type de finition du toit rigide: Gel coat; Peint (assorti); Peint (non assorti); Apprêt/apprêté; Texturé (noir); Non fini; Autre
hr-HR: Vrsta završne obrade tvrdog krova: Gel premaz (gelcoat); Obojano (u boji vozila); Obojano (nije u boji vozila); Temeljni premaz; Teksturirano (crna); Nedovršeno; Ostalo